Missouri, session 2026, HB2034.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 208.152 and 376.1232, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections
2 enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 208.152, 208.830, 376.1232, 376.1233, and
3 376.1234, to read as follows:
208.152. 1. MO HealthNet payments shall be made on behalf of those eligible needy
2 persons as described in section 208.151 who are unable to provide for it in whole or in part,
3 with any payments to be made on the basis of the reasonable cost of the care or reasonable
4 charge for the services as defined and determined by the MO HealthNet division, unless
5 otherwise hereinafter provided, for the following:
6 (1) Inpatient hospital services, except to persons in an institution for mental diseases
7 who are under the age of sixty-five years and over the age of twenty-one years; provided that
8 the MO HealthNet division shall provide through rule and regulation an exception process for
9 coverage of inpatient costs in those cases requiring treatment beyond the seventy-fifth
10 percentile professional activities study (PAS) or the MO HealthNet children's diagnosis
11 length-of-stay schedule; and provided further that the MO HealthNet division shall take into
12 account through its payment system for hospital services the situation of hospitals which
13 serve a disproportionate number of low-income patients;
14 (2) All outpatient hospital services, payments therefor to be in amounts which
15 represent no more than eighty percent of the lesser of reasonable costs or customary charges
16 for such services, determined in accordance with the principles set forth in Title XVIII A and
17 B, Public Law 89-97, 1965 amendments to the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2034 2
18 301, et seq.), but the MO HealthNet division may evaluate outpatient hospital services
19 rendered under this section and deny payment for services which are determined by the MO
20 HealthNet division not to be medically necessary, in accordance with federal law and
21 regulations;
22 (3) Laboratory and X-ray services;
23 (4) Nursing home services for participants, except to persons with more than five
24 hundred thousand dollars equity in their home or except for persons in an institution for
25 mental diseases who are under the age of sixty-five years, when residing in a hospital licensed
26 by the department of health and senior services or a nursing home licensed by the department
27 of health and senior services or appropriate licensing authority of other states or government-
28 owned and -operated institutions which are determined to conform to standards equivalent to
29 licensing requirements in Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section
30 1396, et seq.), as amended, for nursing facilities. The MO HealthNet division may recognize
31 through its payment methodology for nursing facilities those nursing facilities which serve a
32 high volume of MO HealthNet patients. The MO HealthNet division when determining the
33 amount of the benefit payments to be made on behalf of persons under the age of twenty-one
34 in a nursing facility may consider nursing facilities furnishing care to persons under the age of
35 twenty-one as a classification separate from other nursing facilities;
36 (5) Nursing home costs for participants receiving benefit payments under subdivision
37 (4) of this subsection for those days, which shall not exceed twelve per any period of six
38 consecutive months, during which the participant is on a temporary leave of absence from the
39 hospital or nursing home, provided that no such participant shall be allowed a temporary
40 leave of absence unless it is specifically provided for in his or her plan of care. As used in
41 this subdivision, the term "temporary leave of absence" shall include all periods of time
42 during which a participant is away from the hospital or nursing home overnight because he or
43 she is visiting a friend or relative;
44 (6) Physicians' services, whether furnished in the office, home, hospital, nursing
45 home, or elsewhere, provided, that no funds shall be expended to any abortion facility, as
46 defined in section 188.015, or to any affiliate, as defined in section 188.015, of such abortion
47 facility;
48 (7) Subject to appropriation, up to twenty visits per year for services limited to
49 examinations, diagnoses, adjustments, and manipulations and treatments of malpositioned
50 articulations and structures of the body provided by licensed chiropractic physicians
51 practicing within their scope of practice. Nothing in this subdivision shall be interpreted to
52 otherwise expand MO HealthNet services;
53 (8) Drugs and medicines when prescribed by a licensed physician, dentist, podiatrist,
54 or an advanced practice registered nurse; except that no payment for drugs and medicines

HCS HB 2034 3
55 prescribed on and after January 1, 2006, by a licensed physician, dentist, podiatrist, or an
56 advanced practice registered nurse may be made on behalf of any person who qualifies for
57 prescription drug coverage under the provisions of P.L. 108-173;
58 (9) Emergency ambulance services and, effective January 1, 1990, medically
59 necessary transportation to scheduled, physician-prescribed nonelective treatments;
60 (10) Early and periodic screening and diagnosis of individuals who are under the age
61 of twenty-one to ascertain their physical or mental defects, and health care, treatment, and
62 other measures to correct or ameliorate defects and chronic conditions discovered thereby.
63 Such services shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of Section 6403 of P.L.
64 101-239 and federal regulations promulgated thereunder;
65 (11) Home health care services;
66 (12) Family planning as defined by federal rules and regulations; provided, that no
67 funds shall be expended to any abortion facility, as defined in section 188.015, or to any
68 affiliate, as defined in section 188.015, of such abortion facility; and further provided,
69 however, that such family planning services shall not include abortions or any abortifacient
70 drug or device that is used for the purpose of inducing an abortion unless such abortions are
71 certified in writing by a physician to the MO HealthNet agency that, in the physician's
72 professional judgment, the life of the mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to
73 term;
74 (13) Inpatient psychiatric hospital services for individuals under age twenty-one as
75 defined in Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396d, et seq.);
76 (14) Outpatient surgical procedures, including presurgical diagnostic services
77 performed in ambulatory surgical facilities which are licensed by the department of health
78 and senior services of the state of Missouri; except, that such outpatient surgical services shall
79 not include persons who are eligible for coverage under Part B of Title XVIII, Public Law 89-
80 97, 1965 amendments to the federal Social Security Act, as amended, if exclusion of such
81 persons is permitted under Title XIX, Public Law 89-97, 1965 amendments to the federal
82 Social Security Act, as amended;
83 (15) Personal care services which are medically oriented tasks having to do with a
84 person's physical requirements, as opposed to housekeeping requirements, which enable a
85 person to be treated by his or her physician on an outpatient rather than on an inpatient or
86 residential basis in a hospital, intermediate care facility, or skilled nursing facility. Personal
87 care services shall be rendered by an individual not a member of the participant's family who
88 is qualified to provide such services where the services are prescribed by a physician in
89 accordance with a plan of treatment and are supervised by a licensed nurse. Persons eligible
90 to receive personal care services shall be those persons who would otherwise require
91 placement in a hospital, intermediate care facility, or skilled nursing facility. Benefits payable

HCS HB 2034 4
92 for personal care services shall not exceed for any one participant one hundred percent of the
93 average statewide charge for care and treatment in an intermediate care facility for a
94 comparable period of time. Such services, when delivered in a residential care facility or
95 assisted living facility licensed under chapter 198, shall be authorized on a tier level based on
96 the services the resident requires and the frequency of the services. A resident of such facility
97 who qualifies for assistance under section 208.030 shall, at a minimum, if prescribed by a
98 physician, qualify for the tier level with the fewest services. The rate paid to providers for
99 each tier of service shall be set subject to appropriations. Subject to appropriations, each
100 resident of such facility who qualifies for assistance under section 208.030 and meets the
101 level of care required in this section shall, at a minimum, if prescribed by a physician, be
102 authorized up to one hour of personal care services per day. Authorized units of personal care
103 services shall not be reduced or tier level lowered unless an order approving such reduction or
104 lowering is obtained from the resident's personal physician. Such authorized units of personal
105 care services or tier level shall be transferred with such resident if he or she transfers to
106 another such facility. Such provision shall terminate upon receipt of relevant waivers from
107 the federal Department of Health and Human Services. If the Centers for Medicare and
108 Medicaid Services determines that such provision does not comply with the state plan, this
109 provision shall be null and void. The MO HealthNet division shall notify the revisor of
110 statutes as to whether the relevant waivers are approved or a determination of noncompliance
111 is made;
112 (16) Mental health services. The state plan for providing medical assistance under
113 Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1396, et seq., as amended, shall
114 include the following mental health services when such services are provided by community
115 mental health facilities operated by the department of mental health or designated by the
116 department of mental health as a community mental health facility or as an alcohol and drug
117 abuse facility or as a child-serving agency within the comprehensive children's mental health
118 service system established in section 630.097. The department of mental health shall
119 establish by administrative rule the definition and criteria for designation as a community
120 mental health facility and for designation as an alcohol and drug abuse facility. Such mental
121 health services shall include:
122 (a) Outpatient mental health services including preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic,
123 rehabilitative, and palliative interventions rendered to individuals in an individual or group
124 setting by a mental health professional in accordance with a plan of treatment appropriately
125 established, implemented, monitored, and revised under the auspices of a therapeutic team as
126 a part of client services management;
127 (b) Clinic mental health services including preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic,
128 rehabilitative, and palliative interventions rendered to individuals in an individual or group

HCS HB 2034 5
129 setting by a mental health professional in accordance with a plan of treatment appropriately
130 established, implemented, monitored, and revised under the auspices of a therapeutic team as
131 a part of client services management;
132 (c) Rehabilitative mental health and alcohol and drug abuse services including home
133 and community-based preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, and palliative
134 interventions rendered to individuals in an individual or group setting by a mental health
135 or alcohol and drug abuse professional in accordance with a plan of treatment appropriately
136 established, implemented, monitored, and revised under the auspices of a therapeutic team as
137 a part of client services management. As used in this section, mental health professional and
138 alcohol and drug abuse professional shall be defined by the department of mental health
139 pursuant to duly promulgated rules. With respect to services established by this subdivision,
140 the department of social services, MO HealthNet division, shall enter into an agreement with
141 the department of mental health. Matching funds for outpatient mental health services, clinic
142 mental health services, and rehabilitation services for mental health and alcohol and drug
143 abuse shall be certified by the department of mental health to the MO HealthNet division.
144 The agreement shall establish a mechanism for the joint implementation of the provisions of
145 this subdivision. In addition, the agreement shall establish a mechanism by which rates for
146 services may be jointly developed;
147 (17) Such additional services as defined by the MO HealthNet division to be
148 furnished under waivers of federal statutory requirements as provided for and authorized by
149 the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.) subject to appropriation by the
150 general assembly;
151 (18) The services of an advanced practice registered nurse with a collaborative
152 practice agreement to the extent that such services are provided in accordance with chapters
153 334 and 335, and regulations promulgated thereunder;
154 (19) Nursing home costs for participants receiving benefit payments under
155 subdivision (4) of this subsection to reserve a bed for the participant in the nursing home
156 during the time that the participant is absent due to admission to a hospital for services which
157 cannot be performed on an outpatient basis, subject to the provisions of this subdivision:
158 (a) The provisions of this subdivision shall apply only if:
159 a. The occupancy rate of the nursing home is at or above ninety-seven percent of MO
160 HealthNet certified licensed beds, according to the most recent quarterly census provided to
161 the department of health and senior services which was taken prior to when the participant is
162 admitted to the hospital; and
163 b. The patient is admitted to a hospital for a medical condition with an anticipated
164 stay of three days or less;

HCS HB 2034 6
165 (b) The payment to be made under this subdivision shall be provided for a maximum
166 of three days per hospital stay;
167 (c) For each day that nursing home costs are paid on behalf of a participant under this
168 subdivision during any period of six consecutive months such participant shall, during the
169 same period of six consecutive months, be ineligible for payment of nursing home costs of
170 two otherwise available temporary leave of absence days provided under subdivision (5) of
171 this subsection; and
172 (d) The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply unless the nursing home
173 receives notice from the participant or the participant's responsible party that the participant
174 intends to return to the nursing home following the hospital stay. If the nursing home receives
175 such notification and all other provisions of this subsection have been satisfied, the nursing
176 home shall provide notice to the participant or the participant's responsible party prior to
177 release of the reserved bed;
178 (20) Prescribed medically necessary durable medical equipment. An electronic web-
179 based prior authorization system using best medical evidence and care and treatment
180 guidelines consistent with national standards shall be used to verify medical need;
181 (21) Hospice care. As used in this subdivision, the term "hospice care" means a
182 coordinated program of active professional medical attention within a home, outpatient and
183 inpatient care which treats the terminally ill patient and family as a unit, employing a
184 medically directed interdisciplinary team. The program provides relief of severe pain or other
185 physical symptoms and supportive care to meet the special needs arising out of physical,
186 psychological, spiritual, social, and economic stresses which are experienced during the final
187 stages of illness, and during dying and bereavement and meets the Medicare requirements for
188 participation as a hospice as are provided in 42 CFR Part 418. The rate of reimbursement
189 paid by the MO HealthNet division to the hospice provider for room and board furnished by a
190 nursing home to an eligible hospice patient shall not be less than ninety-five percent of the
191 rate of reimbursement which would have been paid for facility services in that nursing home
192 facility for that patient, in accordance with subsection (c) of Section 6408 of P.L. 101-239
193 (Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1989);
194 (22) Prescribed medically necessary dental services. Such services shall be subject to
195 appropriations. An electronic web-based prior authorization system using best medical
196 evidence and care and treatment guidelines consistent with national standards shall be used to
197 verify medical need;
198 (23) Prescribed medically necessary optometric services. Such services shall be
199 subject to appropriations. An electronic web-based prior authorization system using best
200 medical evidence and care and treatment guidelines consistent with national standards shall
201 be used to verify medical need;

HCS HB 2034 7
202 (24) Blood clotting products-related services. For persons diagnosed with a bleeding
203 disorder, as defined in section 338.400, reliant on blood clotting products, as defined in
204 section 338.400, such services include:
205 (a) Home delivery of blood clotting products and ancillary infusion equipment and
206 supplies, including the emergency deliveries of the product when medically necessary;
207 (b) Medically necessary ancillary infusion equipment and supplies required to
208 administer the blood clotting products; and
209 (c) Assessments conducted in the participant's home by a pharmacist, nurse, or local
210 home health care agency trained in bleeding disorders when deemed necessary by the
211 participant's treating physician;
212 (25) Medically necessary cochlear implants and hearing instruments, as defined in
213 section 345.015, that are:
214 (a) Prescribed by an audiologist, as defined in section 345.015; or
215 (b) Dispensed by a hearing instrument specialist, as defined in section 346.010;
216 (26) Orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology devices,
217 supplies, and services in accordance with section 208.830;
218 (27) The MO HealthNet division shall, by January 1, 2008, and annually thereafter,
219 report the status of MO HealthNet provider reimbursement rates as compared to one hundred
220 percent of the Medicare reimbursement rates and compared to the average dental
221 reimbursement rates paid by third-party payors licensed by the state. The MO HealthNet
222 division shall, by July 1, 2008, provide to the general assembly a four-year plan to achieve
223 parity with Medicare reimbursement rates and for third-party payor average dental
224 reimbursement rates. Such plan shall be subject to appropriation and the division shall
225 include in its annual budget request to the governor the necessary funding needed to complete
226 the four-year plan developed under this subdivision.
227 2. Additional benefit payments for medical assistance shall be made on behalf of
228 those eligible needy children, pregnant women and blind persons with any payments to be
229 made on the basis of the reasonable cost of the care or reasonable charge for the services as
230 defined and determined by the MO HealthNet division, unless otherwise hereinafter provided,
231 for the following:
232 (1) Dental services;
233 (2) Services of podiatrists as defined in section 330.010;
234 (3) Optometric services as described in section 336.010;
235 (4) Orthopedic devices [or other prosthetics, including], eye glasses, and dentures[,
236 and wheelchairs];
237 (5) Hospice care. As used in this subdivision, the term "hospice care" means a
238 coordinated program of active professional medical attention within a home, outpatient and

HCS HB 2034 8
239 inpatient care which treats the terminally ill patient and family as a unit, employing a
240 medically directed interdisciplinary team. The program provides relief of severe pain or other
241 physical symptoms and supportive care to meet the special needs arising out of physical,
242 psychological, spiritual, social, and economic stresses which are experienced during the final
243 stages of illness, and during dying and bereavement and meets the Medicare requirements for
244 participation as a hospice as are provided in 42 CFR Part 418. The rate of reimbursement
245 paid by the MO HealthNet division to the hospice provider for room and board furnished by a
246 nursing home to an eligible hospice patient shall not be less than ninety-five percent of the
247 rate of reimbursement which would have been paid for facility services in that nursing home
248 facility for that patient, in accordance with subsection (c) of Section 6408 of P.L. 101-239
249 (Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1989);
250 (6) Comprehensive day rehabilitation services beginning early posttrauma as part of a
251 coordinated system of care for individuals with disabling impairments. Rehabilitation
252 services must be based on an individualized, goal-oriented, comprehensive and coordinated
253 treatment plan developed, implemented, and monitored through an interdisciplinary
254 assessment designed to restore an individual to an optimal level of physical, cognitive, and
255 behavioral function. The MO HealthNet division shall establish by administrative rule the
256 definition and criteria for designation of a comprehensive day rehabilitation service facility,
257 benefit limitations and payment mechanism. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
258 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this subdivision
259 shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
260 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
261 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
262 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
263 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
264 adopted after August 28, 2005, shall be invalid and void.
265 3. The MO HealthNet division may require any participant receiving MO HealthNet
266 benefits to pay part of the charge or cost until July 1, 2008, and an additional payment after
267 July 1, 2008, as defined by rule duly promulgated by the MO HealthNet division, for all
268 covered services except for those services covered under subdivisions (15) and (16) of
269 subsection 1 of this section and sections 208.631 to 208.657 to the extent and in the manner
270 authorized by Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396, et seq.)
271 and regulations thereunder. When substitution of a generic drug is permitted by the prescriber
272 according to section 338.056, and a generic drug is substituted for a name-brand drug, the
273 MO HealthNet division may not lower or delete the requirement to make a co-payment
274 pursuant to regulations of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. A provider of goods
275 or services described under this section must collect from all participants the additional

HCS HB 2034 9
276 payment that may be required by the MO HealthNet division under authority granted herein,
277 if the division exercises that authority, to remain eligible as a provider. Any payments made
278 by participants under this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of payments made by
279 the state for goods or services described herein except the participant portion of the pharmacy
280 professional dispensing fee shall be in addition to and not in lieu of payments to pharmacists.
281 A provider may collect the co-payment at the time a service is provided or at a later date. A
282 provider shall not refuse to provide a service if a participant is unable to pay a required
283 payment. If it is the routine business practice of a provider to terminate future services to an
284 individual with an unclaimed debt, the provider may include uncollected co-payments under
285 this practice. Providers who elect not to undertake the provision of services based on a
286 history of bad debt shall give participants advance notice and a reasonable opportunity for
287 payment. A provider, representative, employee, independent contractor, or agent of a
288 pharmaceutical manufacturer shall not make co-payment for a participant. This subsection
289 shall not apply to other qualified children, pregnant women, or blind persons. If the Centers
290 for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve the MO HealthNet state plan
291 amendment submitted by the department of social services that would allow a provider to
292 deny future services to an individual with uncollected co-payments, the denial of services
293 shall not be allowed. The department of social services shall inform providers regarding the
294 acceptability of denying services as the result of unpaid co-payments.
295 4. The MO HealthNet division shall have the right to collect medication samples from
296 participants in order to maintain program integrity.
297 5. Reimbursement for obstetrical and pediatric services under subdivision (6) of
298 subsection 1 of this section shall be timely and sufficient to enlist enough health care
299 providers so that care and services are available under the state plan for MO HealthNet
300 benefits at least to the extent that such care and services are available to the general
301 population in the geographic area, as required under subparagraph (a)(30)(A) of 42 U.S.C.
302 Section 1396a and federal regulations promulgated thereunder.
303 6. Beginning July 1, 1990, reimbursement for services rendered in federally funded
304 health centers shall be in accordance with the provisions of subsection 6402(c) and Section
305 6404 of P.L. 101-239 (Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1989) and federal regulations
306 promulgated thereunder.
307 7. Beginning July 1, 1990, the department of social services shall provide notification
308 and referral of children below age five, and pregnant, breast-feeding, or postpartum women
309 who are determined to be eligible for MO HealthNet benefits under section 208.151 to the
310 special supplemental food programs for women, infants and children administered by the
311 department of health and senior services. Such notification and referral shall conform to the
312 requirements of Section 6406 of P.L. 101-239 and regulations promulgated thereunder.

HCS HB 2034 10
313 8. Providers of long-term care services shall be reimbursed for their costs in
314 accordance with the provisions of Section 1902 (a)(13)(A) of the Social Security Act, 42
315 U.S.C. Section 1396a, as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder.
316 9. Reimbursement rates to long-term care providers with respect to a total change in
317 ownership, at arm's length, for any facility previously licensed and certified for participation
318 in the MO HealthNet program shall not increase payments in excess of the increase that
319 would result from the application of Section 1902 (a)(13)(C) of the Social Security Act, 42
320 U.S.C. Section 1396a (a)(13)(C).
321 10. The MO HealthNet division may enroll qualified residential care facilities and
322 assisted living facilities, as defined in chapter 198, as MO HealthNet personal care providers.
323 11. Any income earned by individuals eligible for certified extended employment at a
324 sheltered workshop under chapter 178 shall not be considered as income for purposes of
325 determining eligibility under this section.
326 12. If the Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit changes any interpretation or
327 application of the requirements for reimbursement for MO HealthNet services from the
328 interpretation or application that has been applied previously by the state in any audit of a MO
329 HealthNet provider, the Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit shall notify all affected
330 MO HealthNet providers five business days before such change shall take effect. Failure of
331 the Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit to notify a provider of such change shall
332 entitle the provider to continue to receive and retain reimbursement until such notification is
333 provided and shall waive any liability of such provider for recoupment or other loss of any
334 payments previously made prior to the five business days after such notice has been sent.
335 Each provider shall provide the Missouri Medicaid audit and compliance unit a valid email
336 address and shall agree to receive communications electronically. The notification required
337 under this section shall be delivered in writing by the United States Postal Service or
338 electronic mail to each provider.
339 13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or limit the department's
340 statutory requirement to promulgate rules under chapter 536.
341 14. Beginning July 1, 2016, and subject to appropriations, providers of behavioral,
342 social, and psychophysiological services for the prevention, treatment, or management of
343 physical health problems shall be reimbursed utilizing the behavior assessment and
344 intervention reimbursement codes 96150 to 96154 or their successor codes under the
345 Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) coding system. Providers eligible for such
346 reimbursement shall include psychologists.
347 15. There shall be no payments made under this section for gender transition
348 surgeries, cross-sex hormones, or puberty-blocking drugs, as such terms are defined in section
349 191.1720, for the purpose of a gender transition.

HCS HB 2034 11
208.830. 1. As used in this section, terms shall have the same meanings given to
2 them in section 376.1232.
3 2. The MO HealthNet program shall cover orthotic, prosthetic, and complex
4 rehabilitation technology devices, supplies, and services furnished under an order by a
5 prescribing physician or licensed health care prescriber who has authority in this state
6 to prescribe orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology devices. The
7 coverage shall be at least equal to the coverage provided under federal law for health
8 insurance for the aged and disabled under 42 U.S.C. Sections 1395k, 1395l, and 1395m,
9 but only to the extent consistent with this section.
10 3. Coverage for orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology
11 devices, supplies, accessories, and services under this section includes those devices or
12 device systems, supplies, accessories, and services that are customized to the enrollee's
13 needs for purposes of participating in normal life activities in any setting where these
14 activities take place. This requirement applies to the type of device as follows:
15 (1) For orthotic and prosthetic devices, this subsection requires coverage of
16 devices intended for primary or daily use; and
17 (2) For complex rehabilitation technology devices, this subsection requires
18 coverage of:
19 (a) One wheelchair for daily use that meets the enrollee's needs for mobility and
20 positioning; and
21 (b) One wheelchair for backup use.
22 4. The MO HealthNet program shall cover orthotic, prosthetic, and complex
23 rehabilitation technology devices determined by the enrollee's provider to be the most
24 appropriate model that meets the medical, physical, functional, and environmental
25 needs of the enrollee for purposes of participating in normal life activities in any setting
26 where these activities take place; performing physical activities, as applicable, including
27 but not limited to running, biking, and swimming; and maximizing the enrollee's whole-
28 body health and function, including coverage of a high-performance wheelchair to
29 achieve the enrollee's health goals.
30 5. The MO HealthNet program shall cover orthotic, prosthetic, and complex
31 rehabilitation technology devices for showering or bathing.
32 6. Any provision of a complex rehabilitation technology device shall not be
33 covered by the MO HealthNet program for an enrollee under this section unless:
34 (1) The complex rehabilitation technology device is furnished by an accredited
35 complex rehabilitation technology device provider that employs at least one assistive
36 technology professional who is certified and in good standing, without exception, by the
37 Rehabilitation Engineering and Assistive Technology Society of North America

HCS HB 2034 12
38 (RESNA); who specializes in seating, positioning, and mobility; and who regularly
39 receives a Form W-2 from the provider; and
40 (2) The enrollee receives an in-person assessment provided by the assistive
41 technology professional employed by the accredited complex rehabilitation technology
42 device provider as described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
43 7. The coverage set forth in this section includes the repair and replacement of
44 those orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology devices, supplies, and
45 services described in this section.
46 8. Coverage of an orthotic, prosthetic, or complex rehabilitation technology
47 benefit shall not be denied for an individual with a disability or complex medical
48 condition, including but not limited to limb loss or absence, that would otherwise be
49 covered for a nondisabled person seeking medical or surgical intervention to restore or
50 maintain the ability to perform the same activities.
51 9. If coverage for prosthetic, custom orthotic, or complex rehabilitation
52 technology devices is provided, payment shall be made for the replacement of a
53 prosthetic, custom orthotic, or complex rehabilitation technology device or for the
54 replacement of any part of such devices, without regard to continuous use or useful
55 lifetime restrictions, if an ordering health care provider determines that the provision of
56 a replacement device, or a replacement part of a device, is necessary because:
57 (1) Of a change in the physiological condition of the enrollee;
58 (2) Of an irreparable change in the condition of the device or in a part of the
59 device; or
60 (3) The condition of the device, or the part of the device, requires repairs, and
61 the cost of such repairs would be more than sixty percent of the cost of a replacement
62 device or of the part being replaced.
63 10. An entity shall not receive reimbursement from the MO HealthNet program
64 for orthotic, prosthetic, or complex rehabilitation technology devices unless the entity is
65 accredited.
66 11. Prior authorization may be required for orthotic, prosthetic, and complex
67 rehabilitation technology devices, supplies, and services.
68 12. Utilization review determinations shall be rendered in a nondiscriminatory
69 manner and shall not deny coverage for habilitative or rehabilitative benefits, including
70 prosthetics, orthotics, or complex rehabilitation technology services, solely on the basis
71 of an enrollee's actual or perceived disability.
72 13. Evidence of coverage and any benefit denial letters shall include language
73 describing an enrollee's rights under subsection 12 of this section. Any denial of
74 coverage shall be issued in writing with an explanation that contains clear reasoning and

HCS HB 2034 13
75 a description of how and why the request or claim does not meet medical necessity
76 standards.
77 14. Confirmation from a prescribing health care provider may be required if the
78 prosthetic, custom orthotic, or complex rehabilitation technology device or part being
79 replaced is less than three years old.
80 15. (1) Managed care plans subject to this section shall ensure access to
81 medically necessary clinical care and to prosthetic, custom orthotic, and complex
82 rehabilitation technology devices from at least three accredited prosthetic, custom
83 orthotic, and complex rehabilitation technology device facilities or providers in the
84 plan's provider network located in this state, including at least one small business, if any
85 is located in this state.
86 (2) If medically necessary covered orthotic, prosthetic, and complex
87 rehabilitation technology devices are not available from an in-network provider, the
88 plan shall provide processes to refer an enrollee to an out-of-network provider and shall
89 fully reimburse the out-of-network provider at a mutually agreed-upon rate less
90 enrollee cost sharing determined on an in-network basis.
376.1232. 1. As used in sections 376.1232 to 376.1234, the following terms mean:
2 (1) "Accredited", accreditation of an entity to provide comprehensive orthotic,
3 prosthetic, or complex rehabilitation technology devices or services by a Centers for
4 Medicare and Medicaid Services-approved accrediting agency;
5 (2) "Complex rehabilitation technology device", any individually configured
6 medical device, including but not limited to mobility assistive equipment, that:
7 (a) Allows an individual with a mobility limitation to move in indoor and
8 outdoor spaces including, but not limited to, a manual wheelchair, a power wheelchair, a
9 high-performance wheelchair, or a shower or commode chair;
10 (b) Is recommended by a health care professional licensed in this state and
11 operating within his or her scope of practice; and
12 (c) Is deemed medically necessary by a prescribing physician or licensed health
13 care provider who has authority in this state to prescribe complex rehabilitation
14 technology devices;
15 (3) "Complex rehabilitation technology services":
16 (a) The science and practice of evaluating, fitting, adjusting, or servicing, as well
17 as providing the initial training necessary to accomplish the fitting of, a complex
18 rehabilitation technology device for mobility;
19 (b) Evaluation, treatment, and consultation related to a complex rehabilitation
20 technology device;

HCS HB 2034 14
21 (c) Assessment of complex rehabilitation technology devices to maximize
22 function and provide support and alignment necessary to improve the safety and
23 efficiency of mobility and locomotion;
24 (d) Continuation of patient care to assess the effect of the complex rehabilitation
25 technology device on the enrollee's mobility; and
26 (e) Assurance of proper fit and function of the complex rehabilitation technology
27 device by periodic evaluation;
28 (4) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
29 (5) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
30 376.1350. The term "health benefit plan" shall also include the Missouri consolidated
31 health care plan established under chapter 103 and any other state-sponsored health
32 insurance program;
33 (6) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
34 (7) "High-performance wheelchair", a manual or power wheelchair that is
35 designed specifically to enable individuals with mobility limitations to participate in
36 physical activities that support their health goals;
37 (8) "Orthosis" or "orthotic device", an external medical device that is:
38 (a) Custom-fabricated or custom-fitted to a specific patient based on the
39 patient's unique physical condition;
40 (b) Applied to a part of the body to correct a deformity, provide support and
41 protection, restrict motion, improve function, or relieve symptoms of a disease,
42 syndrome, injury, or postoperative condition; and
43 (c) Deemed medically necessary by a prescribing physician or licensed health
44 care provider who has authority in this state to prescribe orthotic devices, supplies, and
45 services;
46 (9) "Orthotics":
47 (a) The science and practice of evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating,
48 assembling, fitting, adjusting, or servicing, as well as providing the initial training
49 necessary to accomplish the fitting of, an orthosis for the support, correction, or
50 alleviation of a neuromuscular or musculoskeletal dysfunction, disease, injury, or
51 deformity;
52 (b) Evaluation, treatment, and consultation related to an orthotic device;
53 (c) Basic observation of gait and postural analysis;
54 (d) Assessment and design of orthoses to maximize function and provide support
55 and alignment necessary to prevent or correct a deformity or to improve the safety and
56 efficiency of mobility and locomotion;

HCS HB 2034 15
57 (e) Continuation of patient care to assess the effect of an orthotic device on the
58 patient's tissues;
59 (f) Assurance of proper fit and function of the orthotic device by periodic
60 evaluation; and
61 (g) Any provision, repair, or replacement of an orthotic device that is furnished
62 or performed by:
63 a. An accredited facility in comprehensive orthotic services; or
64 b. A health care provider licensed in this state and operating within the
65 provider's scope of practice that allows the provider to provide orthotic devices,
66 supplies, or services;
67 (10) "Prosthesis" or "prosthetic device", an external medical device that is:
68 (a) Used to replace or restore a missing limb, appendage, or other external
69 human body part; and
70 (b) Deemed medically necessary by a prescribing physician or licensed health
71 care provider who has authority in this state to prescribe prosthetic devices, supplies,
72 and services;
73 (11) "Prosthetics":
74 (a) The science and practice of evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating,
75 assembling, fitting, aligning, adjusting, or servicing, as well as providing the initial
76 training necessary to accomplish the fitting of, a prosthesis through the replacement of
77 external parts of a human body lost due to amputation or congenital deformities or
78 absences;
79 (b) The generation of an image, form, or mold that replicates the patient's body
80 segment and that requires rectification of dimensions, contours, and volumes for use in
81 the design and fabrication of a socket to accept a residual anatomic limb to, in turn,
82 create an artificial appendage that is designed either to support body weight or to
83 improve or restore function or anatomical appearance, or both;
84 (c) Observational gait analysis and clinical assessment of the requirements
85 necessary to refine and mechanically fix the relative position of various parts of the
86 prosthesis to maximize function, stability, and safety of the patient;
87 (d) The provision and continuation of patient care in order to assess the
88 prosthetic device's effect on the patient's tissues;
89 (e) Assurance of proper fit and function of the prosthetic device by periodic
90 evaluation; and
91 (f) Any provision, repair, or replacement of a prosthetic device that is furnished
92 or performed by:
93 a. An accredited facility in comprehensive prosthetic services; or

HCS HB 2034 16
94 b. A health care provider licensed in this state and operating within the
95 provider's scope of practice that allows the provider to provide prosthetic devices,
96 supplies, or services;
97 (12) "Utilization review", the same meaning given to the term in section
98 376.1350.
99 2. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that offers or issues health benefit plans
100 which are delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or after
101 January 1, 2010, shall [offer] provide coverage for orthotic, prosthetic, and complex
102 rehabilitation technology devices, supplies, and services, including [original] repair and
103 replacement [devices, as prescribed by a physician acting within the scope of his or her
104 practice]. The coverage shall be at least equal to the coverage provided under federal
105 law for health insurance for the aged and disabled under 42 U.S.C. Sections 1395k,
106 1395l, and 1395m, but only to the extent consistent with this section.
107 [2. For the purposes of this section, "health carrier" and "health benefit plan" shall
108 have the same meaning as defined in section 376.1350.]
109 3. The amount of the benefit for orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation
110 technology devices and services under this section shall be no less than the annual and
111 lifetime benefit maximums applicable to the basic health care services required to be provided
112 under the health benefit plan. If the health benefit plan does not include any annual or
113 lifetime maximums applicable to basic health care services, the amount of the benefit for
114 orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology devices and services shall not
115 be subject to an annual or lifetime maximum benefit level. Any co-payment, coinsurance,
116 deductible, and maximum out-of-pocket amount applied to the benefit for orthotic,
117 prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology devices and services shall be no more
118 than the most common amounts applied to the basic health care services required to be
119 provided under the health benefit plan.
120 4. A health carrier or health benefit plan may limit the benefits for, or alter the
121 financial requirements for, out-of-network coverage of orthotic, prosthetic, and complex
122 rehabilitation technology devices, except that the restrictions and requirements that
123 apply to those benefits shall not be more restrictive than the financial requirements that
124 apply to the out-of-network coverage for the basic health care services to be provided
125 under the health benefit plan.
126 5. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall not subject coverage for orthotic,
127 prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology devices, supplies, and services to any
128 limitations for preexisting conditions.
129 6. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall cover orthotic, prosthetic, and
130 complex rehabilitation technology devices when furnished under an order by a

HCS HB 2034 17
131 prescribing physician or licensed health care prescriber who has authority in this state
132 to prescribe orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology devices. The
133 coverage for orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology devices,
134 supplies, accessories, and services shall include those devices or device systems,
135 supplies, accessories, and services that are customized to the covered individual's needs
136 for purposes of participating in normal life activities in any setting where these activities
137 take place.
138 7. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall cover orthotic, prosthetic, and
139 complex rehabilitation technology devices determined by the enrollee's provider to be
140 the most appropriate model that meets the medical, physical, functional, and
141 environmental needs of the enrollee for purposes of participating in normal life
142 activities in any setting where these activities take place; performing physical activities,
143 as applicable, including but not limited to running, biking, and swimming; and
144 maximizing the enrollee's whole-body health and function, including coverage of a high-
145 performance wheelchair to achieve the enrollee's health goals.
146 8. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall cover orthotic, prosthetic, and
147 complex rehabilitation technology devices for showering or bathing.
148 9. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall cover at least the following for an
149 enrollee entitled to coverage of prostheses or orthoses:
150 (1) One prosthesis or orthosis for daily use;
151 (2) One prosthesis or orthosis designed for physical activity; and
152 (3) One prosthesis or orthosis for showering or bathing.
153 10. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall cover at least the following for
154 an enrollee entitled to coverage of complex rehabilitation technology devices:
155 (1) One wheelchair for daily use that meets the enrollee's needs for mobility and
156 positioning;
157 (2) One wheelchair for backup use; and
158 (3) One high-performance wheelchair if medically necessary to enable the
159 enrollee to engage in physical activities, as applicable, including but not limited to
160 running, biking, swimming, and strength training, and to maximize the enrollee's whole-
161 body health and lower or upper limb function.
162 11. Any provision of a complex rehabilitation technology device shall not be
163 covered by a health carrier or health benefit plan for an enrollee under this section
164 unless:
165 (1) The complex rehabilitation technology device is furnished by an accredited
166 complex rehabilitation technology device provider that employs at least one assistive
167 technology professional who is certified and in good standing, without exception, by the

HCS HB 2034 18
168 Rehabilitation Engineering and Assistive Technology Society of North America
169 (RESNA); who specializes in seating, positioning, and mobility; and who regularly
170 receives a Form W-2 from the provider; and
171 (2) The enrollee receives an in-person assessment provided by the assistive
172 technology professional employed by the accredited complex rehabilitation technology
173 device provider as described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
174 12. A health carrier or health benefit plan may require prior authorization for
175 orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation technology devices, supplies, and
176 services in the same manner and to the same extent as prior authorization is required
177 for any other covered benefit.
178 13. An entity shall not receive reimbursement from a state-sponsored health
179 insurance program for orthotic, prosthetic, or complex rehabilitation technology devices
180 unless the entity is accredited.
181 14. Except as provided in subsection 15 of this section, the provisions of this
182 section shall not apply to a supplemental insurance policy, including a life care contract,
183 accident-only policy, specified disease policy, hospital policy providing a fixed daily benefit
184 only, [Medicare supplement policy,] long-term care policy, short-term major medical policies
185 of six months or less duration, or any other supplemental policy as determined by the director
186 of the department of commerce and insurance.
187 15. Notwithstanding section 376.998 or any other provision of law to the
188 contrary, the provisions of this section shall apply to a Medicare supplement policy.
376.1233. 1. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall render utilization
2 review determinations in a nondiscriminatory manner and shall not deny coverage for
3 habilitative or rehabilitative benefits, including prosthetics, orthotics, or complex
4 rehabilitation technology devices and services, solely on the basis of an enrollee's actual
5 or perceived disability.
6 2. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall not deny a prosthetic, orthotic, or
7 complex rehabilitation technology benefit for an individual with a disability or complex
8 medical condition, including but not limited to limb loss or absence, that would
9 otherwise be covered for a nondisabled person seeking medical or surgical intervention
10 to restore or maintain the ability to perform the same activities.
11 3. A health benefit plan offered, issued, or renewed in this state that offers
12 coverage for prosthetics, custom orthotic devices, and complex rehabilitation technology
13 devices shall include language describing an enrollee's rights under subsections 1 and 2
14 of this section in its evidence of coverage and any benefit denial letters. Any denial of
15 coverage shall be issued in writing with an explanation that contains clear reasoning and

HCS HB 2034 19
16 a description of how and why the request or claim does not meet medical necessity
17 standards.
18 4. A health carrier or health benefit plan that provides coverage for prosthetic,
19 orthotic, or complex rehabilitation technology services shall ensure access to medically
20 necessary clinical care and to prosthetic, custom orthotic, and complex rehabilitation
21 technology devices from not less than three accredited prosthetic, custom orthotic, and
22 complex rehabilitation technology device facilities or providers in the plan's provider
23 network located in this state, including at least one small business, if any is located in
24 this state. If medically necessary covered orthotics, prosthetics, and complex
25 rehabilitation technology services are not available from an in-network provider, the
26 health carrier or health benefit plan shall provide processes to refer a member to an out-
27 of-network provider and shall fully reimburse the out-of-network provider at a
28 mutually agreed-upon rate less member cost sharing determined on an in-network
29 basis.
30 5. If coverage for prosthetic, custom orthotic, or complex rehabilitation
31 technology devices is provided, payment shall be made for the replacement of a
32 prosthetic, custom orthotic, or complex rehabilitation technology device or for the
33 replacement of any part of such devices, without regard to continuous use or useful
34 lifetime restrictions, if an ordering health care provider determines that the provision of
35 a replacement device, or a replacement part of a device, is necessary because:
36 (1) Of a change in the physiological condition of the patient;
37 (2) Of an irreparable change in the condition of the device or in a part of the
38 device; or
39 (3) The condition of the device, or the part of the device, requires repairs, and
40 the cost of such repairs would be more than sixty percent of the cost of a replacement
41 device or of the part being replaced.
42 6. Confirmation from a prescribing health care provider may be required if the
43 prosthetic, custom orthotic, or complex rehabilitation technology device or part being
44 replaced is less than three years old.
376.1234. 1. Before October 1, 2027, each health carrier that issues a health
2 benefit plan providing coverage of orthotic, prosthetic, and complex rehabilitation
3 technology devices, supplies, and services as required under sections 376.1232 to
4 376.1234 shall report to the director of the department of commerce and insurance on
5 its experience with the requirements of sections 376.1232 to 376.1234 for the first year
6 following the effective date of this section. The report shall be in a form prescribed by
7 the director and shall include the number of claims and the total amount of claims paid
8 in this state for the services required by sections 376.1232 to 376.1234. The director

HCS HB 2034 20
9 shall aggregate this data in a report and submit the report to the house and senate
10 standing committees having jurisdiction over health insurance matters before December
11 1, 2027.
12 2. The director may promulgate any necessary rules and regulations to
13 implement sections 376.1232 to 376.1234. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
14 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
15 shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
16 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
17 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
18 chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
19 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
20 proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔